Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2129.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 9-418, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE9-418. Annual reports by trustees A. The trustees, on or before the first second Monday of July of each year, shall make a report to the governing body of the city or town containing: 1. A full statement of all property and money monies received, where derived and how used and expended. 2. The number of books, journals and other publications on hand, the number added by gift, purchase or otherwise during the year, the number lost or missing and the number and kind of those loaned. 3. Such Any other statistics, information and suggestions as that may be of general interest. B. A financial report, showing all receipts and disbursements of money monies, shall be made by the secretary of the board of trustees,  and verified by oath. END_STATUTE